California statutes. Elections Code
(b) The department shall provide to the Secretary of State, on a weekly basis and in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State, the identification information described in subdivision (c) for all of the following persons:

(1) Persons imprisoned for the conviction of a felony and under the jurisdiction of the department. To the extent available, identification information provided by the department regarding these persons shall include the date on which each person’s term of imprisonment began.

(2) Persons on parole or persons released from imprisonment for the conviction of a felony
 and no longer under the jurisdiction of the department. To the extent available, identification information provided by the department regarding these persons shall include the dates on which each person’s parole began and on which the person was discharged from the jurisdiction of the department.

(c) Personal identification information for the purposes of subdivision (b) includes all of the following:

(1) All known first names.

(2) All known last names.

(3) All known middle names.

(4) All known name suffixes.

(5) Last known address.

(6) Date of birth.

(7) Last four digits of the person’s social security number, if available.

(8) Driver’s license or state-issued identification number, if available.

(d) Upon receipt of the information described in subdivision (b), the Secretary of State shall do all the following:

(1) Identify any registration record in the statewide voter database that contains personal identifying information that, for each of the unique identifiers described in subdivision (c), as available, matches information pertaining to the person described in subdivision (b).

(2) For any matched records described in paragraph (1), provide the information described in subdivision (b) and the corresponding unique identifier or identifiers used in the statewide voter database to county elections officials within three days of receipt of the information from the department.

(e) Upon receipt of information from the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d), a county elections official shall do all of the following:

(1) Cancel the affidavit of registration of any person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) whose registration information matches the unique identifier or identifiers used in the statewide voter database provided by the Secretary of State to the county.

(2) Using the form prepared by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (f), notify a person described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and whose last known address is within the county based on the unique identifier or identifiers used in the statewide voter database provided by the Secretary of State to the county, that the person’s voting rights are restored and advise the person that if the person is otherwise entitled to register to vote, the person may register to vote. The county elections official shall also provide the person with information regarding the procedure for registering to vote.

(f) The Secretary of State shall prepare a form to be used by county elections officials to provide the notice described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(g) A county or county elections official shall not be liable for taking or failing to take the actions described in subdivision (e) when the county or county elections official have received erroneous information from the Secretary of State or the department.

(h) If a person who is ineligible to vote receives a notice under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), subsequently becomes registered or preregistered to vote, and votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the person’s registration or preregistration, that person shall be presumed to have acted with official authorization and shall not be guilty of fraudulently voting or attempting to vote pursuant to Section 18560, unless that person willfully votes or attempts to vote knowing that the person is not entitled to
 vote.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 14, Sec. 4.   (SB 504)   Effective March 31, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2213.

Any person may proceed by action in the superior court to compel the county elections official to cancel any registration made illegally or which should be canceled by reason of facts that have occurred subsequent to the registration. If the voter whose registration is sought to be canceled is not a party to the action, the court may order him or her to be made a party defendant.

The county elections official and as many persons against whom there are causes of action may be joined as defendants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2214.

(a) Each month, the Secretary of State shall post on its internet website a report showing, for the preceding period, the number of voting rights disqualifications and the number of voting rights restorations pursuant to each of Sections 2208 through 2212, as applicable, that were ordered within each county and the number of proceedings specified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2208 that occurred within each county.

(b) In consultation with the Judicial Council, the Secretary of State shall prepare and deliver a training via a remote web-based learning platform that is accessible through the Secretary of State’s internet website. The
 training shall contain information about the responsibilities of superior courts and county elections officials, as specified in this chapter, and information about the legal standards for voting rights disqualification, the duties of court investigators, and the reporting requirements for courts related to voting rights disqualification and restoration.

(c) At least annually, each court executive officer and each county elections official shall complete the training described in subdivision (b). The trainings completed by court executive officers and county elections officials shall be tracked through the remote web-based learning platform provided by the Secretary of State.

(d) This section shall become operative on January
 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 12.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Residency Confirmation Procedures [2220. - 2227.]

2220.

(a) The county elections official shall conduct a preelection residency confirmation procedure as provided in this article. This procedure shall be completed by the 90th day immediately before the primary election. The procedure shall be initiated by mailing a nonforwardable postcard to each registered voter of the county preceding the direct primary election. Postcards mailed pursuant to this article shall be sent “Address Correction Requested, Return Postage Guaranteed,” and shall be in substantially the following form:

“We are requesting your assistance in correcting the addresses of voters who have moved and have not reregistered.

“1. If you still live at the address noted on this postcard, your voter registration
 will remain in effect and you may disregard this notice.

“2. If the person named on this postcard is not at this address, please return this postcard to your mail carrier.”

(b) The county elections official, at the county elections official’s discretion, shall not be required to mail a residency confirmation postcard pursuant to subdivision (a) to any of the following:

(1) A voter who has voted at an election held within the last six months preceding the start of the confirmation procedure.

(2) A voter who has confirmed the voter’s voter registration records on the internet website of the Secretary of State within the last year preceding the start of the confirmation procedure.

(3) A
 person under 18 years of age who has submitted a properly executed affidavit of registration pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2102 and who will not be 18 years of age on or before the primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

2221.

(a) Based on the postal notices on the returned residency confirmation postcards received pursuant to Section 2220, the county elections official shall take the following actions:

(1) The voter registration status of a voter whose residency confirmation postcard is returned by the post office as undeliverable and who has no forwarding address shall be updated by the county elections official to inactive pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2226, and the voter shall be mailed a confirmation notice, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 2225.

(2) The voter registration record of a voter for whom a forwarding address within the county or outside the county is received shall be
 immediately updated by the county elections official to reflect the new address provided by the post office, the former address shall be maintained with the voter registration record, and the voter shall be mailed a confirmation notice, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2225.

(b) All updates to a voter’s registration record made pursuant to this section shall be reflected on the voter list as required by Section 2191.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2222.

In lieu of mailing a residency confirmation postcard, as prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 2220, the Secretary of State or a county elections official may contract with the United States Postal Service or its licensees to obtain use of postal service change-of-address data, such as the National Change of Address System (NCOA) and Operation Mail. The data received by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section shall be shared with county elections officials through the statewide voter registration database.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 3.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2223.

(a) In lieu of mailing a residency confirmation postcard to each registered voter in the county, the county elections official may include the return address of the county elections official’s office on the outside portion of the county voter information guide or county voter information guide envelope mailed to the voter for an election conducted within the last six months preceding the start of the confirmation process,
 along with the statements “Address Correction Requested” and “Notice: If the person named on the county voter information guide is not at the address, please help keep the voter rolls current and save taxpayer dollars by returning this county voter information guide to your mail carrier.”

(b) A voter not eligible for an election during the last six months preceding the start of the confirmation process, or a voter not mailed a county voter information guide with an address correction requested, shall have his or her address confirmed by either a residency confirmation postcard or an address verification mailing conducted pursuant to this article using NCOA/Operation Mail data pursuant to Section 2222 or consumer credit reporting agency data pursuant to Section 2227.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 7.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.

(a) If a voter has not voted in an election within the preceding four years, and the voter’s residence address, name, or party preference has not been updated during that time, the county elections official may send an alternate residency confirmation postcard. The use of this postcard may be sent subsequent to NCOA or county voter information guide returns, but shall not be used in the residency confirmation process conducted under Section 2220. The postcard shall be forwardable, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form to enable the voter to verify or correct the address information, and shall be in substantially the following form:

“If the person named on the postcard is not at this address, PLEASE help keep the voter rolls current and save taxpayer dollars by returning
 this postcard to your mail carrier.”

“IMPORTANT NOTICE”

“According to our records you have not voted in any election during the past four years, which may indicate that you no longer reside in ____ County. If you continue to reside in California you must confirm your residency address in order to remain on the active voter list and receive election materials in the mail.”

“If confirmation has not been received within 15 days, you may be required to provide proof of your residence address in order to vote at future elections.”

(b) The use of a toll-free number to confirm the old residence address is optional. A change to a voter’s address shall be received in writing.

(c) A county using the alternate residency confirmation procedure shall notify all
 voters of the procedure in the county voter information guide or in a separate mailing.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 4.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section inoperative January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions)
-------------------------------------------

2225.

(a) (1) Based on change-of-address data received from the United States Postal Service or its licensees, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form, to enable the voter to verify or correct address information.

(2) If notification received through NCOA or Operation Mail or a returned mailing indicates that a voter has moved and has given no forwarding address or indicates that a voter has moved out of the state, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice in substantially the same format as the notice set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 20507 of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(b) If postal service change-of-address data indicates that the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, the forwardable notice shall be in substantially the following form:
“We have received notification that you have moved to a new residence address in California. Your voter registration record has been updated to this new address. If this is correct, you do not have to take any action. If this is incorrect, you can notify our office by either returning the attached postage-paid postcard, or by calling toll free; you must notify us at least 15 days prior to the next election or you may be required to vote using a provisional ballot.”
(c) If postal service change-of-address data received from a nonforwardable mailing indicates that a voter has moved and left no forwarding address or
 indicates that a voter has moved out of the state, a forwardable notice shall be sent in substantially the same format as the notice set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 20507 of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(d) The use of a toll-free number to confirm the old residence address is optional. Any change to the voter address must be received in writing.

(e) Upon the mailing of the forwardable address confirmation notice described in subdivision (b) to a voter, the county elections official shall not update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive.

(f) Upon the mailing of the forwardable address confirmation notice described in subdivision (c) to a voter, the county elections official shall update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 5.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2226.

(a) Based on change-of-address information received pursuant to Sections 2220 to 2225, inclusive, or change-of-address information provided directly by the voter, the county elections official shall take the following actions as appropriate:

(1) If the information indicates the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, the county elections official shall immediately update the voter’s registration record.

(2) If the mailings have been returned as undeliverable, or if NCOA, Operation Mail, a returned mailing, or postal service change-of-address data received from a nonforwardable mailing indicates that the voter has moved and left no forwarding address, or if any of these sources indicate
 that a voter has moved out of the state, the county elections official shall update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive. Voters with an inactive voter registration status do not receive election materials and are not included in calculations to determine the number of signatures required for qualification of candidates and measures, precinct size, or other election administration-related processes.

(3) If a voter’s registration status is inactive based on the voter’s failure to confirm the voter’s address pursuant to Section 2224, the county elections official shall send a forwardable address verification mailing, as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2225. The voter registration record of a voter who fails to respond to the address verification mailing, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing described in Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that
 mailing, shall be canceled.

(b) The voter registration record of a voter whose status is inactive for failure to respond to an address verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, shall be canceled.

(c) A voter who has a registration status of inactive, who offers to vote at any election between the date of the verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, or who notifies the elections official of a continued residency, shall have the voter’s voter registration status updated to active.

(d) All address updates, cancellations, and active and inactive transactions
 made to voter registration records pursuant to this section shall be reflected on the voter list as required by Section 2191.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until the date that the Secretary of State certifies that the state’s statewide voter registration database, which was developed in compliance with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), has been modified to notify county elections officials when a voter confirms the voter’s registration record on the Secretary of State’s internet website, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 6.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own conditions.   See later operative version, added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

2226.

(a) Based on change-of-address information received pursuant to Sections 2220 to 2225, inclusive, or change-of-address information provided directly by the voter, the county elections official shall take the following actions as appropriate:

(1) If the information indicates the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, the county elections official shall immediately update the voter’s registration record.

(2) If the mailings have been returned as undeliverable, or if NCOA, Operation Mail, a returned mailing, or postal service change-of-address data received from a nonforwardable mailing indicates that the voter has moved and left no forwarding address, or if any of
 these sources indicate that a voter has moved out of the state, the county elections official shall update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive. Voters with an inactive voter registration status do not receive election materials and are not included in calculations to determine the number of signatures required for qualification of candidates and measures, precinct size, or other election administration-related processes.

(3) If a voter’s registration status is inactive based on the voter’s failure to confirm the voter’s address pursuant to Section 2224, the county elections official shall send a forwardable address verification mailing, as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2225. However, the county elections official shall not send this mailing to a voter who has confirmed the voter’s voter registration record on the internet website of the Secretary of State within a year from the date of the mailing. The voter
 registration record of a voter who fails to respond to the address verification mailing, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing described in Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, shall be canceled.

(b) The voter registration record of a voter whose status is inactive for failure to respond to an address verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, shall be canceled.

(c) A voter who has a registration status of inactive, who offers to vote at any election between the date of the verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, who notifies the
 elections official of a continued residency, or who has confirmed the voter’s voter registration record on the internet website of the Secretary of State, shall have the voter’s voter registration status updated to active.

(d) All address updates, cancellations, and active and inactive transactions made to voter registration records pursuant to this section shall be reflected on the voter list as required by Section 2191.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 262, Sec. 7.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

2227.

(a) In lieu of mailing a residency confirmation postcard, as prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 2220, the county elections official may contract with a consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees to obtain use of change-of-address data in accordance with this section.

(b) If the county elections official contracts with a consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees pursuant to subdivision (a), all of the following shall occur:

(1) For each registered voter in the county, the county elections official shall initiate a search for change-of-address data with the consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees by providing the name and residence address of each registered voter in the
 county to the consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees.

(2) The consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees shall search their databases for each name and address provided by the county elections official and shall report to the county elections official any information indicating that the registered voter changed the voter’s residence address.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 2194 of this code or Section 7924.000 of the Government Code, and except as provided in paragraph (2), a county elections official may disclose a registered voter’s name and residence address to a consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees pursuant to, and in accordance with, this section.

(2) A county elections official shall not disclose to a consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees the name
 and residence address of a registered voter if that information is deemed confidential pursuant to Section 2166, 2166.5, 2166.7, 2166.8, or 2166.9 of this code, or Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) A consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees shall use the information provided by a county elections official only pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and shall not retain any information received from the county elections official pursuant to this section.

(e) Based on change-of-address data received from a consumer credit reporting agency or its licensees, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form, which may be in the form of a postcard, to the registered voter to enable the voter to verify or correct address information. The
 forwardable notice shall be in substantially the following form:
“We have received notification that you have moved to a new residence address in ____ County. You will remain registered to vote at your old address unless you notify our office that the address to which this card was mailed is a change of your permanent residence. Please notify our office in writing by returning the attached postage-paid postcard. If this is not a permanent residence, and you do not wish to change your address for voting purposes, please disregard this notice.”
(f) The county elections official shall take all of the following actions as appropriate:

(1) If a voter responds to the forwardable notice sent pursuant to subdivision (e) or otherwise verifies in a signed writing
 that the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, the county elections official shall verify the signature on the response by comparing it to the signature on file for the voter and, if appropriate, immediately update the voter’s registration record with the new residence address.

(2) If a voter does not respond to the forwardable notice sent pursuant to subdivision (e) and does not otherwise verify in a signed writing that the voter has moved to a new residence address, the elections official shall not update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive or cancel the voter registration.

(g) For purposes of this section, “consumer credit reporting agency” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reimbursable File Maintenance [2240. - 2241.]

2240.

From moneys appropriated by the Legislature, the Controller shall reimburse counties for additional costs incurred by counties for purging voter registration files pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2220).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.

Any claim submitted to the Controller pursuant to this article shall state that the county had reimbursable costs and the number of registered voters in the county as determined by the Secretary of State under subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 2187. The claims shall be made to the Controller by October 31 of the even-numbered year in which a direct primary and general election are held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Motor Voter [2250. - 2250.]

2250.

On and after July 1, 2007, in any document mailed by a state agency that offers a person the opportunity to register to vote pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) that state agency shall include a notice informing prospective voters that if they have not received voter registration information within 30 days of requesting it, they should contact their local elections office or the office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 88.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. California New Motor Voter Program [2260. - 2277.]

2260.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California New Motor Voter Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (AB 1461)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Voter registration is one of the biggest barriers to participation in our democracy.

(b) In 1993, Congress enacted the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.), commonly known as the “Motor Voter Law,” with findings recognizing that the right of citizens to vote is a fundamental right; it is the duty of federal, state, and local governments to promote the exercise of the right to vote; and the primary purpose of the act is to increase the number of eligible citizens who register to vote.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact the California New Motor Voter Program to
 provide California citizens additional opportunities to participate in democracy through exercise of their fundamental right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (AB 1461)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2262.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Completed voter registration” and “completed voter registration application” mean the part of the driver’s license application containing the voter registration application for an applicant who has not affirmatively declined to register to vote, the transmittal of which is not prohibited by subdivision (f) of Section 2265, and which includes the minimum information necessary to prevent duplicate voter registrations and preregistrations, to assess the eligibility of the applicant, and to administer voter registration, preregistration, and other procedures for elections.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(c) “Driver’s license application” means a driver’s license or identification card application, renewal, or notification of a change of address pursuant to Section 12800, 12815, 13000, or 14600 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 39.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.

(a) The Secretary of State and the department shall establish the California New Motor Voter Program for the purpose of increasing opportunities for voter registration by any person who is qualified to be a voter under Section 2 of Article II of the California Constitution.

(b) This chapter shall not be construed as requiring the
 department to determine eligibility for voter registration and voting. The Secretary of State is solely responsible for determining eligibility for voter registration, voter preregistration, and voting.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2262 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2264.

(a) Every driver’s license application shall include a voter registration application. All of the following apply to the voter registration application included with the driver’s license application:

(1) The voter registration application shall require only the minimum information necessary to prevent duplicate voter registrations and to enable the Secretary of State to assess the eligibility of the applicant and to administer voter registration and other procedures for elections.

(2) The voter registration application shall not require any information that duplicates information required for the driver’s license
 application, other than an additional signature or other information required by paragraph (3).

(3) The voter registration application shall include all of the following:

(A) A statement of the voter eligibility requirements, including those regarding citizenship.

(B) An attestation that the applicant meets each voter eligibility requirement.

(C) The signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury.

(D) An opportunity to decline to register to vote.

(b) A voter who attests to the voter’s eligibility shall be registered to vote unless the voter
 affirmatively declines to register to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 5.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2265.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the Secretary of State, shall establish a schedule and method for the department to electronically provide to the Secretary of State the records specified in this section.

(2) The department and the Secretary of State shall develop and enter into an interagency agreement specifying how the department and the Secretary of State will cooperate to fulfill the requirements of this chapter. The agreement shall be updated as necessary, and the current version of the agreement shall be published on the internet website of the Secretary of State, except those parts of the agreement for which publication would compromise
 security.

(b) (1) The department shall provide to the Secretary of State, in a manner and method to be determined by the department in consultation with the Secretary of State, the following information associated with each person who submits a driver’s license application:

(A) Name.

(B) Date of birth.

(C) Either or both of the following, as contained in the department’s records:

(i) Residence address.

(ii) Mailing address.

(D) Digitized signature, as
 described in Section 12950.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(E) Telephone number, if available.

(F) Email address, if available.

(G) Language preference, if available.

(H) Political party preference, if available.

(I) Whether the person chooses to become a permanent vote by mail voter, if available.

(J) Whether the person affirmatively declined to become registered or preregistered to vote during a transaction with the department.

(K) A notation that the applicant has attested that the
 person meets all voter eligibility requirements, including United States citizenship, specified in Section 2101 and, as applicable, the preregistration eligibility requirements in subdivision (d) of Section 2102.

(L) Other information specified in regulations implementing this chapter.

(2) (A) A completed voter registration application included with a driver’s license application and accepted at the department shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State no later than 10 days after the department accepts it.

(B) A completed voter registration application accepted within five days of the last day to register to vote for a federal or statewide election shall be transmitted to the
 Secretary of State no later than five days after the date of acceptance.

(C) (i) For purposes of establishing the department’s transmittal deadlines required by this paragraph and by Section 20504(e) of Title 52 of the United States Code, the completed voter registration application included with the driver’s license application shall be deemed accepted on the date the completed voter registration application arrives at the department, whether by mail, in person, electronically, or in another manner, the application contains all of the information in paragraph (1) except to the extent paragraph (1) requires certain information to be provided only if available, and the department approves the documentation of identity submitted by the applicant that is required by the Vehicle Code for the type of license or identification card
 for which the applicant has applied.

(ii) This subparagraph shall become operative upon the completion of the Digital eXperience Platform project described in Item 2740-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21 and 69, Stats. 2021), or on July 1, 2025, whichever is earlier.

(3) (A) The department shall accept and transmit a completed voter registration application included with a driver’s license application as described in paragraph (2) even if, pursuant to the Vehicle Code, the driver’s license application is incomplete or the driver’s license or identification card associated with the voter who submitted the voter registration application is inactive due to a failure to pay fees, or any other reason that is unrelated to either of the following:

(i) The department’s approval of an applicant’s identity documentation pursuant to the Vehicle Code.

(ii) An elections official’s ability to prevent duplicate voter registrations or preregistrations, to assess the eligibility of the applicant, or to administer voter registration, preregistration, and other elections procedures.

(B) This paragraph shall become operative upon the completion of the Digital eXperience Platform project described in Item 2740-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21 and 69, Stats. 2021), or on July 1, 2025, whichever is earlier.

(4) (A) The department may provide the records described in paragraph (1) to the
 Secretary of State before the Secretary of State certifies that all of the conditions set forth in subdivision (e) of this section have been satisfied. Records provided pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used for purposes of outreach and education to eligible voters conducted by the Secretary of State.

(B) The Secretary of State shall provide materials created for purposes of outreach and education as described in this paragraph in languages other than English, as required by the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(c) The Secretary of State shall not sell, transfer, or allow any third party access to the information acquired from the department pursuant to this chapter without approval of the department, except as permitted by this chapter and Section
 2194.

(d) The department shall not electronically provide records of a person who applies for or is issued a driver’s license pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code because the person is unable to submit satisfactory proof that the person’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(e) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b), the department shall commence implementation of this section no later than one year after the Secretary of State certifies all of the following:

(1) The state has a statewide voter registration database that complies with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(2) The Legislature has appropriated the funds necessary for the Secretary of State and the department to implement and maintain the California New Motor Voter Program.

(3) The regulations required by Section 2277 have been adopted.

(f) The department shall not electronically provide records pursuant to this section that contain a home address designated as confidential pursuant to Section 1808.2, 1808.4, or 1808.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department continue its best practice of sending notice to voters when there is a delay in processing completed voter registration applications. It is further the intent of the
 Legislature that the notices continue to provide information about alternative options for submitting a voter registration application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 40.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.
